District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2113

Superintendent authorized to prescribe regulations.

Repealed.

June 22, 1948, 62 Stat. 574, ch. 597, § 4
Reorg. Plan No. 1 (1953), 67 Stat. 631, 18 F.R. 2053, § 5
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(x)

History

1981 Ed., § 32-613.
1973 Ed., § 32-415.

Prior Codifications

Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.

Effective Dates